Maine, session 132, LD26.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §551, sub-§5, ¶A, as amended by PL 2015, c. 319, §16, is further
amended to read:
A. Administrative expenses, personal services and equipment costs of the department
related to the administration and enforcement of this subchapter and subchapter 2‑B,
except that total disbursements for personal services may not exceed $7,000,000 per
fiscal year adjusted on an annual basis based on the Consumer Price Index as published
by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics;
Page 1 - 132LR0166(03)